Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-240.20
Permitted improvements and growing crops of lessee; appraisers; fee.

The appraisers shall receive a reasonable fee, not to exceed fifty dollars each, for their services, to be fixed by the county judge, and the same shall be taxed to the lessee.

Laws 1967, c. 467, § 11, p. 1454;

Laws 1969, c. 589, § 2, p. 2440.